Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.293

Committee on geographic names—Meetings—Rules—Reports and recommendations.

(1) The committee on geographic names shall hold at least two meetings each year, and may hold special meetings as called by the chair or a majority of the members of the committee. All meetings must be open to the public.

(a) Notice of all committee meetings shall be as provided in RCW 42.30.080. The notice must include the names to be considered by the committee and the names to be adopted by the board on geographic names.

(b) Four committee members shall constitute a quorum.

(2) The committee shall establish rules for the conduct of its affairs and to carry out the duties of this section.

(3) The committee shall cooperate with the United States board on geographic names.

(4) The committee shall make reports and recommendations to the board on geographic names following each meeting of the committee. Recommendations regarding adoption of names may only be made following consideration at two committee meetings.

(5) In considering the names and spellings of geographic place names, the committee's recommendations to the board on geographic names may only be made after careful deliberation of all available information relating to such names, including the recommendations of the United States board on geographic names.

[ 2011 c 355 s 4.]